Washington statutes.
RCW 26.40.040

Petition by parent for order of commitment—Contents—Who may be co-custodians—Effective date.

The petition for an order for the commitment of a child to custody shall request the court to issue an order for the commitment of such child to the co-custody of the state and a relative or relatives, a friend or friends, an attorney or attorneys, a church through its chief officers, a fraternal organization through its chief officers, or a service organization through its chief officers, who shall be named in the petition. The petition shall also request the court to issue such order making the commitment of such child to custody effective as of the date that both parents of such child are deceased or are determined by the court to be unable to continue parental responsibilities for such child as provided in RCW 26.40.070.

[ 1955 c 272 s 4.]